Massachusetts, session 194th, H1881.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 221 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition is hereby
amended by adding the following new section:
SECTION X:
Section 1. Individual or individuals serving on behalf of an Indian Tribe that has received
official recognition by the Commission on Indian Affairs shall be granted permission to
represent said Tribe on matters before the full legal system of Massachusetts and shall not be
deemed to be in violation of M.G.L. Chapter 221, section 41, M.G.L. Chapter 221, Section 46A,
or any other statute prohibiting self-representation or fraudulent practice of law.
Section2. Any individual or individuals representing an Indian Tribe before the courts in
Massachusetts must submit to the courts an affidavit attesting to their status as a non-lawyer, that
of 2

they have not passed the Massachusetts bar, and that they are not representing themselves to be a
licensed practitioner of law. Failure to provide such affidavit shall constitute a violation of
M.G.L. Chapter 221, sections 41 and 46A.
Section 3. Such rights and privileges of ‘self-representation’ may only extend full Tribal
matters and shall not extend to individual members of such Tribes.
of 2